District of Columbia statutes.
47-848

Sale of tax delinquent property — Transference of ownership.

The Council is hereby authorized to establish a program whereby title to properties acquired by tax sale pursuant to §§ 47-847 and 47-1303 may, for whatever consideration or sum it deems appropriate, be transferred to persons, nonprofit organizations or nonprofit developers, meeting criteria which shall be established by the Council, and who:

(1)

Guarantee to pay taxes on the property;

(2)

Live in the property for at least 5 years (for residential property owners), or maintain active ownership and legal possession of the property for at least 10 years and provide needed community services in the District for at least 10 years (for nonprofit organizations or developers); and

(3)

Give assurance of bringing the property into reasonable compliance with the building code in the District.

History

Sept. 3, 1974, 88 Stat. 1059, Pub. L. 93-407, title IV, § 438
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 11, 1999, D.C. Law 13-11, § 3(b), 46 DCR 5487
June 12, 2003, D.C. Law 14-310, § 14(b), 50 DCR 1092

Cross References

Financial institutions, application to conduct business, loan policies and homestead development programs, see § 26-704.
Savings and loan association acquisitions, applications, loan policies and homestead development programs, see § 26-1204.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 26-704 and § 26-1204.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-848.
1973 Ed., § 47-658.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-11 provided alternatively to living on the property for 5 years that one “maintain active ownership and legal possession of the property for at least 10 years and provide needed community services in the District for at least 10 years (for nonprofit organizations or developers).”
D.C. Law 14-310, in the introductory paragraph, substituted “§§ 47-847 and 47-1303” for “§ 47-847”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 3(d)(1) and 6(b) of the Redevelopment Land Agency Disposition Review Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-524, January 11, 2001, 48 DCR 624).